tr: Yağ basınç sensörü fonksiyon tipi: Kombine şalter + sensör; Yağ basınç sensörü (değişken); Yağ basınç şalteri (açık/kapalı); Diğer
zh-TW: 油壓感測器功能類型: 組合開關 + 發送器; 機油壓力發送器 (可變); 機油壓力開關 (開/關); 其他
ro-RO: Tipul funcției senzorului de presiune a uleiului: Comutator combinat + emițător; Emițător presiune ulei (variabil); Comutator presiune ulei (pornit/oprit); Altele
lt-LT: Alyvos slėgio jutiklio funkcijos tipas: Kombinuotasis jungiklis + siųstuvas; Alyvos slėgio siųstuvas (kintamas); Alyvos slėgio jungiklis (įjungti / išjungti); Kita
de: Funktionstyp des Öldrucksensors: Kombination aus Schalter und Sensor; Öldrucksensor (variabel); Öldruckschalter (Ein/Aus); Andere
pl: Czujnik ciśnienia oleju Typ Functions: Przełącznik i czujnik (kombinowany); Czujnik ciśnienia oleju (analogowy); Czujnik ciśnienia oleju (włącznik/wyłącznik); Inny
da: Funktionstype for olietrykssensor: Kombinationsafbryder og -sender; Olietrykssender (variabel); Olietryksafbryder (tænd/sluk); Andet
sk-SK: Funkčný typ snímača tlaku oleja: Kombinovaný spínač a snímač; Snímač tlaku oleja (variabilný); Spínač tlaku oleja (zap/vyp); Iné
sl-SI: Vrsta funkcije senzorja tlaka olja: Kombinirano stikalo + oddajnik; Oddajnik tlaka olja (variabilni); Stikalo tlaka olja (vklop/izklop); Drugo
ru: Тип функции датчика давления масла: Комбинированный (реле + датчик); Датчик давления масла (аналоговый); Реле давления масла (вкл/выкл); Другое
ko: 오일 압력 센서 기능 유형: 조합 스위치 + 센더; 오일 압력 센더(가변); 오일 압력 스위치(온/오프); 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de função do sensor de pressão do óleo: Interruptor de combinação e emissor; Emissor de pressão do óleo (variável); Interruptor de pressão do óleo (ligar/desligar); Outro
it: Tipo di funzione del sensore di pressione dell'olio: Interruttore + trasmettitore combinati; Trasmettitore di pressione dell'olio (variabile); Interruttore di pressione dell'olio (on/off); Altro
el: Τύπος λειτουργίας αισθητήρα πίεσης λαδιού: Συνδυασμός διακόπτη και πομπού; Πομπός πίεσης λαδιού (μεταβλητός); Διακόπτης πίεσης λαδιού (on/off); Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип функция на сензора за налягане на маслото: Комбиниран превключвател + сензор; Сензор за налягане на маслото (променлив); Превключвател за налягане на маслото (вкл./изкл.); Друго
fr: Fonction du capteur de pression d’huile: Contacteur + émetteur combinés; Émetteur de pression d'huile (variable); Contacteur de pression d'huile (on/off); Autre
pt-BR: Sensor de pressão do óleo tipo de função: Interruptor + transmissor combinados; Transmissor de pressão de óleo (variável); Interruptor de pressão de óleo (liga/desliga); Outro
en: Oil pressure sensor function type: Combination switch + sender; Oil pressure sender (variable); Oil pressure switch (on/off); Other
es: Tipo de función del sensor de presión de aceite: Interruptor combinado + emisor; Emisor de presión de aceite (variable); Interruptor de presión de aceite (encendido/apagado); Otro
th: ประเภทการทำงานของเซ็นเซอร์แรงดันน้ำมัน: สวิตช์และตัวส่งสัญญาณในตัว; ตัวส่งสัญญาณแรงดันน้ำมัน (แบบแปรผัน); สวิตช์แรงดันน้ำมัน (เปิด/ปิด); อื่นๆ
vi: Loại chức năng của cảm biến áp suất dầu: Công tắc kết hợp + bộ phát; Bộ phát áp suất dầu (biến thiên); Công tắc áp suất dầu (bật/tắt); Khác
sv: Funktionstyp för oljetryckssensor: Kombinerad strömbrytare + givare; Oljetrycksgivare (variabel); Oljetrycksvakt (på/av); Övrigt
ja: 油圧センサーFunctionsタイプ: コンビネーションスイッチ + センダー; 油圧センダー (可変); 油圧スイッチ (オン/オフ); その他
zh-CN: 机油压力传感器功能类型: 组合开关和发送器; 机油压力发送器（可变）; 机油压力开关（开/关）; 其他
hu: Olajnyomás-érzékelő funkció típusa: Kombinált kapcsoló és jeladó; Olajnyomás-jeladó (változó); Olajnyomás-kapcsoló (be/ki); Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta funkcije osjetnika tlaka ulja: Kombinirani prekidač + davač; Davač tlaka ulja (promjenjivi); Prekidač tlaka ulja (uklj./isklj.); Ostalo
nb: Funksjonstype for oljetrykksensor: Kombinert bryter og sender; Oljetrykksender (variabel); Oljetrykksbryter (av/på); Annet
nl: Oliedruksensor functietype: Combinatieschakelaar en zender; Oliedrukzender (variabel); Oliedrukschakelaar (aan/uit); Overig
cs: Typ funkce senzoru tlaku oleje: Kombinovaný spínač a snímač; Snímač tlaku oleje (variabilní); Spínač tlaku oleje (zap/vyp); Ostatní
fi: Öljynpaineanturin toimintatyyppi: Yhdistelmä (kytkin + anturi); Öljynpaineanturi (muuttuva); Öljynpainekytkin (on/off); Muu